Illinois, session 104th, SB251.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Operating Room Patient Safety Act. 6    Section 3. Purpose. It is the public policy of the State 7that the State has a legitimate interest in ensuring that all 8surgical procedures are performed to ensure maximum patient 9safety. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to: 10        (1) ensure that an operating room has been prepared by 11    qualified, trained professionals; 12        (2) ensure that surgical equipment and instruments are 13    properly sterilized and functioning safely; 14        (3) ensure that during surgical procedures, the 15    surgical team can rely on qualified, trained professionals 16    to ensure a sterile environment is maintained; and 17        (4) provide the surgical team with proper instruments 18    and supplies as requested. 19    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:20    "Health care facility" means a facility regulated under 21the Hospital Licensing Act, the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment 22Center Act, or the University of Illinois Hospital Act.   SB0251- 2 -LRB104 03428 BAB 13451 b1"Health care facility" does not include a health care facility 2that is a critical access hospital as designated by the 3Department of Public Health in accordance with 42 CFR 485, 4Subpart F, or a rural emergency hospital as defined under 5subsection (kkk)(2) of Section 1861 of the federal Social 6Security Act. 7    "Surgical technologist" means an individual who is 8employed by or contracts with a health care facility to 9perform surgical technology services and functions. 10    "Surgical technology services" means surgical patient care 11including, but not limited to, one or more of the following: 12        (1) preparation of an operating room and the sterile 13    operating field for surgical procedures by ensuring that 14    surgical equipment is functioning properly and safely and 15    using sterile techniques to prepare surgical supplies 16    instruments and equipment; 17        (2) intraoperative anticipation and response to the 18    needs of surgeons, nurses, and other surgical team members 19    by monitoring the sterile operating field in an operating 20    room and providing the required instruments or supplies; 21        (3) performance of tasks at the sterile operating 22    field, as directed in an operating room setting, 23    including: 24            (A) passing surgical supplies, instruments, and 25        equipment directly to a health care provider; 26            (B) sponging or suctioning an operative site;   SB0251- 3 -LRB104 03428 BAB 13451 b1            (C) preparing and cutting suture material; 2            (D) transferring and irrigating with fluids; 3            (E) transferring, but not administering, drugs 4        within the sterile field; or 5            (F) handling surgical specimens. 6    Section 10. Requirements for surgical technologists. Each 7surgical technologist hired or contracted by a health care 8facility on or after January 1, 2027 shall meet one or more of 9the following requirements: 10        (1) The surgical technologist has successfully 11    completed an educational program nationally accredited by 12    the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education 13    Programs or the Accrediting Bureau of Health Education 14    Schools for surgical technologists and holds and maintains 15    certification as a surgical technologist from a national 16    certifying body that certifies surgical technologists.17        (2) If the surgical technologist has successfully 18    completed the educational requirements under paragraph (1) 19    but has not, on the date the surgical technologist is 20    hired or enters into the contract with the health care 21    facility, obtained the national certification under 22    paragraph (1), the surgical technologist must obtain that 23    certification within 18 months after being hired or 24    entering into the contract. 25        (3) The surgical technologist is registered as a   SB0251- 4 -LRB104 03428 BAB 13451 b1    registered surgical technologist under the Registered 2    Surgical Assistant and Registered Surgical Technologist 3    Title Protection Act. 4        (4) The surgical technologist has successfully 5    completed a training program for surgical technology in 6    the armed forces of the United States or the United States 7    Public Health Service.8        (5) The surgical technologist has engaged in the 9    practice of surgical technology at a hospital licensed 10    under the Hospital Licensing Act or an ambulatory surgical 11    treatment center licensed under the Ambulatory Surgical 12    Treatment Center Act before January 1, 2027. 13    Section 15. Exemptions. Nothing in this Act prohibits an 14individual from performing surgical technology services if the 15individual is acting within the scope of the individual's 16license or registration or is a student or intern under the 17direct supervision of a licensed health care provider.